Hawaii statutes.
§104-30 Application of this chapter to
contracts entered into without regard to other laws. The fact that a
contract is or was entered into without regard to chapter 103D, or upon a
cost-plus-a-fixed fee basis, or cost-plus-a-fixed percentage basis, or without
advertising for proposals, shall not render this chapter inapplicable to the
contract, if otherwise this chapter would be applicable. [L 1995, c 181, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next